Illinois, session 104th, HB1898.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   HB1898- 2 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   HB1898- 3 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   HB1898- 4 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   HB1898- 5 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   HB1898- 6 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   HB1898- 7 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   HB1898- 8 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB1898- 9 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   HB1898- 10 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   HB1898- 11 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   HB1898- 12 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   HB1898- 13 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   HB1898- 14 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   HB1898- 15 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   HB1898- 16 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 9        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 10        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 11        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 12        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 13        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 14        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 16        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250;19            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 22        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 23        total as distributions under the provisions of any 24        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 25        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 26        retired partners, which payments are excluded in   HB1898- 17 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 2        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 3        adopted pursuant thereto;4            (G) The valuation limitation amount;5            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 10        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 11        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 12        computation of taxable income;13            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 18        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   HB1898- 18 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (K);4            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 5        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 6        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 7        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code;9            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 19        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 20        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 24        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 25        250;26            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in   HB1898- 19 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 2        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 3        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 4        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 5        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 6        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 7        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 8        net of bond premium amortization;9            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 10        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 11        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;12            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 13        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 14        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 15        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 17        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 18        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 19        held under claim of right for the taxable year;20            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 21        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 22        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 23        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 24        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 25        illness;26            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or   HB1898- 20 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;2            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 3        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 4        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 5        medical care savings account established under the 6        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 7        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 8        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 9        as provided in that Act;10            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 11        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 12        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 13        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 14        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 15        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 16        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);17            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 18        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 19        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 20        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 21        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 22        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;23            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 24        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 25        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 26        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed   HB1898- 21 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 2        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 3        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 4        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 5        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 6        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 7        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 8        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 9        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 10        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 11        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 12        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 13        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 14        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 15        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 16        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 17        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 18        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 19        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 20        times a number that represents the fractional 21        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 22        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 23        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;24            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 25        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 26        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year   HB1898- 22 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 2        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 5        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 6        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 7        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 8        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 9        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 10        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 11        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 12        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 13        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 14        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 15        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 16        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 17        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 18        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 19        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 20        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 21        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 22        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 23        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 24        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 25        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 26        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this   HB1898- 23 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 2        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 3        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 4        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 5        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 6        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 7        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 8        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 9        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 10        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;11            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 12        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 13        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 14        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 15        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 16        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 18        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 19        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 20        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 21        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 22        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 23        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 24        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 26        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes   HB1898- 24 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 2        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 3        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 4        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250;6            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 7        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 8        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 9        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 10        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 11        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:12                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 13            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 14            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 15            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 16            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 17            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 18            including the bonus depreciation deduction;19                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 20            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 21            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 22            0.429); and23                (3) for taxable years ending after December 24            31, 2005:25                    (i) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted   HB1898- 25 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 2                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 3                by 0.429);4                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 7                1.0;8                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 11                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 12                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 13                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 14                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 15                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 16                depreciation on that property; and17                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 18                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 19                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 20                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 21                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 22                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 23                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 24                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 25                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 26                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)).   HB1898- 26 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            The aggregate amount deducted under this 2        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 3        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 4        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 5        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 6        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 7        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250;9            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 10        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 11        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 12        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 13        an amount equal to that addition modification. 14            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 15        the last day of the last tax year for which a 16        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 17        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 18        required in any taxable year to make an addition 19        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 20        equal to that addition modification. 21            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 22        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 23        one piece of property.24            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 25        provisions of Section 250;26            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income,   HB1898- 27 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        other than salary, received by a driver in a 2        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;3            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   HB1898- 28 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 13        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250; 15            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 16        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 17        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB1898- 29 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 7        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 8        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 9        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;10            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 11        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 12        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 13        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 14        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; 16            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   HB1898- 30 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 4        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 8        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 9        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 10        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 11        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 12        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 13        be considered moneys contributed under this 14        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 15        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 16        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 17        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 18            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 19        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 20        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 21        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 23        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 24        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 25        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 26        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code;   HB1898- 31 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 3        operating in this State and licensed under the 4        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 5        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 6        organization operating in this State and licensed 7        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 8        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 9        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 10        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 11        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 12        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 13        of Section 250; and 14            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 15        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 16        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 17        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 18        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 19        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 20        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 21        another state; and 22            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 23        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 24        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 25        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 26        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal   HB1898- 32 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 2        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 3        during the taxable year from a qualified community 4        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 5        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 6        Act. 7            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 8        provisions of Section 250; . 9            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 11        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 12        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 13        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 14        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 15        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 16        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 17        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 18        the provisions of Section 250; and . 19            (NN) For taxable years beginning on or after 20        January 1, 2026, an amount equal to the amount of 21        gratuities included in the taxpayer's federal adjusted 22        gross income for the taxable year; as used in this 23        subparagraph (NN), "gratuities" has the meaning given 24        to that term in Section 3 of the Minimum Wage Law; this 25        subparagraph (NN) is exempt from the provisions of 26        Section 250.    HB1898- 33 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1    (b) Corporations.2        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base 3    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 4    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).5        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 6    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 7    of the following amounts:8            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 9        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 10        received from regulated investment companies during 11        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 12        income in the computation of taxable income;13            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 14        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 15        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 16        year;17            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 18        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 19        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 20        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 21        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 22        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 23        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 24        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 25        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing   HB1898- 34 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        law and is not a new enactment);2            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 3        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 4        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 5        ending prior to December 31, 1986;6            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 7        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 8        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 9        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 10        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 11        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 12        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 13        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 14        year, with the following limitations applied in the 15        order that they are listed:16                (i) the addition modification relating to the 17            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 18            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 19            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 20            of addition modification under this subparagraph 21            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 22            which was taken into account in calculating the 23            base income of an earlier taxable year, and24                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 25            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 26            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to   HB1898- 35 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 2            such carryback or carryforward;3            For taxable years in which there is a net 4        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 5        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 6        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 7        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 8        computed independently under the preceding provisions 9        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;10            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 11        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 12        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 13        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 14        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;15            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 16        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 17        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 18        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 19        the Internal Revenue Code;20            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 21        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 22        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 23        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 24        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 25        deductions taken in all taxable years under 26        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.  HB1898- 36 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 2        the last day of the last tax year for which a 3        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 4        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 5        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 6        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 7        equal to that subtraction modification. 8            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 9        modification under this subparagraph only once with 10        respect to any one piece of property;11            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 12        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 13        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 14        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 15        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 16        member of the same unitary business group but for the 17        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 18        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 19        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 20        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 21        who would be a member of the same unitary business 22        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 23        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 24        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 25        required to apportion business income under different 26        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification   HB1898- 37 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 2        extent that dividends were included in base income of 3        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 4        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 5        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 6        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 7        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 8        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 9        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 10        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 11        accrued, or incurred. 12            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 13                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 14            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 15            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 16            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 17            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 18            with respect to such interest; or19                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 20            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 21            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 22            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 23            following:24                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 25                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 26                to a person that is not a related member, and  HB1898- 38 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 2                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 3                person did not have as a principal purpose the 4                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 5                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 6                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 7                terms; or 8                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 9            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 10            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 11            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 12            and terms and the principal purpose for the 13            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 14            or 15                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 16            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 17            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 18            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 19            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 20            to the application or use of an alternative method 21            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 22                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 23            Director from making any other adjustment 24            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 25            for any tax year beginning after the effective 26            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is   HB1898- 39 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 2            Department and such regulations provide methods 3            and standards by which the Department will utilize 4            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 5            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 6        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 7        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 8        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 9        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 10        foreign person who would be a member of the same 11        unitary business group but for the fact that the 12        foreign person's business activity outside the United 13        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 14        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 15        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 16        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 17        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 18        from being included in the unitary business group 19        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 20        business income under different subsections of Section 21        304. The addition modification required by this 22        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 23        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 24        group for the same taxable year and received by the 25        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 26        business group (including amounts included in gross   HB1898- 40 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 2        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 3        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 4        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 5        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 6        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 7        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 8        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 9        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 10        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 11        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 12        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 13        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 14        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 15        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 16        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 17        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 18        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 19        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 20        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 21        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 22        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 23        similar types of intangible assets.24            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:25                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB1898- 41 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 2            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 3            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 4            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 5            with respect to such item; or6                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 7            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 8            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 9            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 10            following:11                    (a) the person during the same taxable 12                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 13                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 14                not a related member, and15                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 16                intangible expense or cost between the 17                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 18                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 19                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 20                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 21                or22                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 23            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 25            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 26            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable;   HB1898- 42 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 2            writing to the application or use of an 3            alternative method of apportionment under Section 4            304(f); 5                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 6            Director from making any other adjustment 7            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 8            for any tax year beginning after the effective 9            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 10            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 11            Department and such regulations provide methods 12            and standards by which the Department will utilize 13            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 14            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 15        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 16        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 17        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 18        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 19        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 20        business group but for the fact that the person is 21        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 22        included in the unitary business group because he or 23        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 24        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 25        addition modification required by this subparagraph 26        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were   HB1898- 43 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        included in base income of the unitary group for the 2        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 3        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 4        (including amounts included in gross income under 5        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 6        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 7        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 8        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 9        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 10        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 11        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 12        the addition modification required under Section 13        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 14        Act; 15            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 16        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 17        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 18        to a real estate investment trust under Section 19        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 20        dividends paid;21            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 22        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 23        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 24        Act;25            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 26        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction   HB1898- 44 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 2        for the taxable year; 3            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 4        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 5        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 6        Code for the taxable year; 7            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 8        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 9        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 10        Code for the taxable year; 11            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 12        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 13        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 14        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 15            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 16        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 17        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 18        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 19        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 20        Tax Credit Act; 21    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 22    following amounts:23            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 24        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 25        and included in such total for the taxable year;26            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such   HB1898- 45 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;2            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company, 3        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 4        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 5        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 6        for the taxable year;7            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 8        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 9        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 10        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 11        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 13        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 14        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 15        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 16        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 17        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 18        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 19        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 20        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 24        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 25        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 26        the case of a life insurance company with gross income   HB1898- 46 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 2        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 3        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 4        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 5        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 6        from the provisions of Section 250;7            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 8        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 9        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 10        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 11        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 12        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 13        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 14        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 15        net of bond premium amortization;16            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 17        such total which were paid by a corporation which 18        conducts business operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 20        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 21        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 22        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 23        the provisions of Section 250;24            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 25        such total that were paid by a corporation that 26        conducts business operations in a federally designated   HB1898- 47 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 2        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 3        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 4        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 5        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 6        this subparagraph (L);7            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 8        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 9        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 10        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 11        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 12        property which is eligible for the River Edge 13        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 14        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 15        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 16        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 17        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 18        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 19        investment credit property which secures the loan or 20        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 21        such property on the date that it was placed in service 22        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 23        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 24        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 25        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 26        such loan attributable to the eligible property as   HB1898- 48 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        calculated under the previous sentence. This 2        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 5        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 6        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 7        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 8        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 9        property which is eligible for the High Impact 10        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 11        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 12        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 13        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 14        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 15        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 16        investment credit property which secures the loan or 17        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 18        such property on the date that it was placed in service 19        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 20        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 21        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 22        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 23        eligible for the deduction provided under this 24        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 25        available to taxpayers in any year under this 26        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest   HB1898- 49 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 2        attributable to the eligible property as calculated 3        under the previous sentence;4            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 5        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 6        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 7        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 8        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 9        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 10        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 11        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 12        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 13        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 14        provisions of Section 250;15            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 16        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 17        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 18        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 19        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 20        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 21        income and received from a corporation that is not 22        created or organized under the laws of the United 23        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 24        including, for taxable years ending on or after 25        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 26        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951   HB1898- 50 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 2        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph 3        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 4        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 5        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 6        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 7        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 8        included in taxable income and received, including, 9        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 10        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 11        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 12        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 13        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 14        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 15        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 16        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 17        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 18        affiliated group which includes the dividend 19        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 20        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 21        this subsection (b) which is related to such 22        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 23        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 24        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 25        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 26        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to   HB1898- 51 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 2        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This 3        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 4        Section 250 of this Act;5            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 6        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 7        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;8            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 9        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 10        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 11        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 14        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 15        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 16        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 17        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 18        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 19        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 20        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 21        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 22        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 23        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 24        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 25        Section 250;26            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December   HB1898- 52 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 2        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a 3        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 4        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 5        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 6        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 7        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 8        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 9        provisions of Section 250;10            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 11        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 12        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 13        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 14        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 15        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:16                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 17            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 18            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 19            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 20            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 21            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 22            including the bonus depreciation deduction;23                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 24            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 25            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 26            0.429); and  HB1898- 53 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1                (3) for taxable years ending after December 2            31, 2005:3                    (i) for property on which a bonus 4                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 5                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 6                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 7                by 0.429);8                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 11                1.0;12                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 13                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 14                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 15                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 16                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 17                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 18                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 19                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 20                depreciation on that property; and21                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 22                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 23                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 24                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 25                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 26                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation   HB1898- 54 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 2                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 3                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 4                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 5            The aggregate amount deducted under this 6        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 7        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 8        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 9        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 10        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 11        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 12        Section 250;13            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 14        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 15        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 16        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 17        equal to that addition modification.18            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 19        the last day of the last tax year for which a 20        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 21        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 22        required in any taxable year to make an addition 23        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 24        equal to that addition modification. 25            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 26        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any   HB1898- 55 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        one piece of property.2            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the 3        provisions of Section 250;4            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 5        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 6        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 7        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 8        modification with respect to such transaction under 9        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 10        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 11        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 12        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 13        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 14        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 15        that is required to make an addition modification with 16        respect to such transaction under Section 17        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 18        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 19        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 20        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 21        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 22        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 23        an addition modification with respect to such 24        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 25        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 26        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that   HB1898- 56 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt 2        from the provisions of Section 250; 3            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 4        into account for the taxable year (net of the 5        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 6        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 7        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 8        for the fact that the foreign person's business 9        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 10        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 11        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 18        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 19        made for the same taxable year under Section 20        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 21        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 22        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250; 24            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 25        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 26        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to   HB1898- 57 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 2        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 3        for the fact that the foreign person's business 4        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 5        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 6        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 7        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 8        business group but for the fact that the person is 9        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 10        included in the unitary business group because he or 11        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 12        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 13        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 14        made for the same taxable year under Section 15        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 16        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 17        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 18        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 19            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 20        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 21        add back any insurance premiums under Section 22        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 23        that part of a reimbursement received from the 24        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 25        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 26        company) that would have been taken into account as a   HB1898- 58 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 2        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 3        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 4        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 5        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 6        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 7        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250; 9            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 10        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 11        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 12        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 13        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 14        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 15        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 16        provisions of Section 250; and 17            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 19        operating in this State and licensed under the 20        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 21        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 22        organization operating in this State and licensed 23        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 24        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 25        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 26        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be   HB1898- 59 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 2        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 3        of Section 250. 4        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 5    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 6    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 7    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 8    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 9    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 10    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 11    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 12    (c) Trusts and estates.13        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 14    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 15    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).16        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 17    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 18    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 19    following amounts:20            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 21        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 22        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 23        in the computation of taxable income;24            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 25        trust which, under its governing instrument, is   HB1898- 60 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        required to distribute all of its income currently, 2        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such 3        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 4        the computation of taxable income;5            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 6        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 7        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 8        year;9            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 10        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 11        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 12        ending prior to December 31, 1986;13            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 14        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 15        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 16        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 17        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 18        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 19        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 20        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 21        the following limitations applied in the order that 22        they are listed:23                (i) the addition modification relating to the 24            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 25            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 26            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount   HB1898- 61 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            of addition modification under this subparagraph 2            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 3            which was taken into account in calculating the 4            base income of an earlier taxable year, and5                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 6            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 7            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 8            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 9            such carryback or carryforward;10            For taxable years in which there is a net 11        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 12        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 13        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 14        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 15        computed independently under the preceding provisions 16        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;17            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 18        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 19        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 20        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 21        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 22        of this Act;23            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 24        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 25        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 26        computation of taxable income;  HB1898- 62 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 2        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 3        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 4        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 5        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 6        201;7            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 8        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 9        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 10        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 11        the Internal Revenue Code; and12            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 13        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 14        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 15        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 16        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 17        deductions taken in all taxable years under 18        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.19            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 20        the last day of the last tax year for which a 21        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 22        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 23        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 24        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount 25        equal to that subtraction modification. 26            The taxpayer is required to make the addition   HB1898- 63 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        modification under this subparagraph only once with 2        respect to any one piece of property;3            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 4        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 5        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 8        member of the same unitary business group but for the 9        fact that the foreign person's business activity 10        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 11        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 12        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 13        who would be a member of the same unitary business 14        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 15        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 16        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 17        required to apportion business income under different 18        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 19        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 20        extent that dividends were included in base income of 21        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 22        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 23        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 24        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 25        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 26        included in gross income under Section 78 of the   HB1898- 64 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 2        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 3        accrued, or incurred. 4            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 5                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 6            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 7            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 8            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 9            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 10            with respect to such interest; or11                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 12            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 13            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 14            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 15            following:16                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 17                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 18                to a person that is not a related member, and19                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 20                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 21                person did not have as a principal purpose the 22                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 23                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 24                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 25                terms; or 26                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on   HB1898- 65 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 2            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 3            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 4            and terms and the principal purpose for the 5            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 6            or 7                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 8            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 9            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 10            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 11            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 12            to the application or use of an alternative method 13            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 14                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 15            Director from making any other adjustment 16            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 17            for any tax year beginning after the effective 18            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 19            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 20            Department and such regulations provide methods 21            and standards by which the Department will utilize 22            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 23            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 24        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 25        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 26        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable   HB1898- 66 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 2        foreign person who would be a member of the same 3        unitary business group but for the fact that the 4        foreign person's business activity outside the United 5        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 6        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 8        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 9        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 10        from being included in the unitary business group 11        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 12        business income under different subsections of Section 13        304. The addition modification required by this 14        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 15        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 16        group for the same taxable year and received by the 17        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 18        business group (including amounts included in gross 19        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 21        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 22        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 23        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 24        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 25        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 26        dividends caused a reduction to the addition   HB1898- 67 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 2        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 3        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 4        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 5        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 6        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 7        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 8        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 9        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 10        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 11        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 12        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 13        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 14        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 15        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.16            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:17                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 18            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 19            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 20            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 21            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 22            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 23            with respect to such item; or24                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 25            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 26            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based   HB1898- 68 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 2            following:3                    (a) the person during the same taxable 4                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 5                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 6                not a related member, and7                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 8                intangible expense or cost between the 9                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 10                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 11                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 12                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 13                or14                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 15            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 16            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 17            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 18            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 19            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 20            writing to the application or use of an 21            alternative method of apportionment under Section 22            304(f); 23                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 24            Director from making any other adjustment 25            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 26            for any tax year beginning after the effective   HB1898- 69 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 2            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 3            Department and such regulations provide methods 4            and standards by which the Department will utilize 5            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 6            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 8        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 9        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 10        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 11        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 12        business group but for the fact that the person is 13        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 14        included in the unitary business group because he or 15        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 16        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 17        addition modification required by this subparagraph 18        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 19        included in base income of the unitary group for the 20        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 21        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 22        (including amounts included in gross income under 23        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 24        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 25        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 26        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs   HB1898- 70 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 2        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 3        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 4        the addition modification required under Section 5        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 6        Act;7            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 8        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 9        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 10        Act;11            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 12        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 13        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        for the taxable year; 15            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 16        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 17        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 18        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 19        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 20        Tax Credit Act; 21    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 22    following amounts:23            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 24        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 25        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 26        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total   HB1898- 71 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        as distributions under the provisions of any 2        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 3        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 4        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 5        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 6        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 7        adopted pursuant thereto;8            (I) The valuation limitation amount;9            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 10        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 11        and included in such total for the taxable year;12            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 13        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 14        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 15        taxation by this State either by reason of its 16        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 17        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 18        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 19        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 20        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 21        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 22        premium amortization;23            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 24        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 25        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 26        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code,   HB1898- 72 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 2        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 3        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 4        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 5        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 6        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 7        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 8        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 9        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 10        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 11        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 12        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 13        250;14            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 15        such total which were paid by a corporation which 16        conducts business operations in a River Edge 17        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 18        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 19        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 20        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 21        the provisions of Section 250;22            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 23        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 24        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;25            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in 26        such total that were paid by a corporation that   HB1898- 73 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        conducts business operations in a federally designated 2        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 3        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 4        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 5        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 6        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 7        this subparagraph (O);8            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 9        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 10        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 11        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 14        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 15        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 16        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 17        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 18        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 19        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 20        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 21        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 22        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 23        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 24        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 25        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 26        during, and immediately after World War II, including,   HB1898- 74 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 2        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 3        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 4        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 5        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 6        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 7        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 8        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 9        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 10        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 11        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 12        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 13        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 14        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 15        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 16        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 17        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 18        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 21        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 22        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 23        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 24        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 25        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:26                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation   HB1898- 75 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 2            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 3            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 4            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 5            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 6            including the bonus depreciation deduction;7                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 8            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 9            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 10            0.429); and11                (3) for taxable years ending after December 12            31, 2005:13                    (i) for property on which a bonus 14                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 15                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 16                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 17                by 0.429);18                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 19                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 20                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 21                1.0;22                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 23                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 24                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 25                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 26                depreciation deduction that would be allowed   HB1898- 76 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 2                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 3                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 4                depreciation on that property; and5                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 6                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 7                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 8                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 9                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 10                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 11                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 12                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 13                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 14                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 15            The aggregate amount deducted under this 16        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 17        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 18        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 19        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 20        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 21        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250;23            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 24        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 25        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 26        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount   HB1898- 77 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        equal to that addition modification.2            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 3        the last day of the last tax year for which a 4        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 5        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 6        required in any taxable year to make an addition 7        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 8        equal to that addition modification. 9            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 10        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 11        one piece of property.12            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 13        provisions of Section 250;14            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 15        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 16        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 17        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 18        modification with respect to such transaction under 19        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 20        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 21        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 22        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 23        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 24        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 25        that is required to make an addition modification with 26        respect to such transaction under Section   HB1898- 78 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 2        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 3        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 4        from the provisions of Section 250; 5            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 6        into account for the taxable year (net of the 7        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 8        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 10        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 11        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 20        addition modification required to be made for the same 21        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 22        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 23        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 24        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 25            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible 26        property taken into account for the taxable year (net   HB1898- 79 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 2        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 3        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 4        for the fact that the foreign person's business 5        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 6        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 7        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 8        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 9        business group but for the fact that the person is 10        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 11        included in the unitary business group because he or 12        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 13        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 14        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 15        made for the same taxable year under Section 16        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 17        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 18        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 20            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 21        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 22        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 23        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 24        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 25        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt 26        from Section 250;   HB1898- 80 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 2        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 3        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 4        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 5        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;6            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 7        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 8        add back any insurance premiums under Section 9        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 10        that part of a reimbursement received from the 11        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 12        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 13        company) that would have been taken into account as a 14        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 15        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 16        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 17        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 18        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 19        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 20        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 21        Section 250;22            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 23        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 24        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 25        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal 26        Revenue Code; and   HB1898- 81 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 3        operating in this State and licensed under the 4        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 5        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 6        organization operating in this State and licensed 7        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 8        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 9        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 10        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 11        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 12        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 13        of Section 250. 14        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 15    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 16    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 17    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 18    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 19    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 20    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 21    (d) Partnerships.22        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 23    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 24    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).25        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in   HB1898- 82 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 2    of the following amounts:3            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 4        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 5        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 6        in the computation of taxable income;7            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 8        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 9        the taxable year;10            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 11        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 12        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 13        income;14            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 15        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 16        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 17        computation of taxable income;18            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 19        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 20        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 21        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 22        the Internal Revenue Code;23            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 24        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 25        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 26        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then   HB1898- 83 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 2        deductions taken in all taxable years under 3        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.4            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 5        the last day of the last tax year for which a 6        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 7        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 8        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 9        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 10        equal to that subtraction modification. 11            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 12        modification under this subparagraph only once with 13        respect to any one piece of property;14            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 15        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 16        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 18        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the same unitary business group but for the 20        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 21        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 22        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 23        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 24        who would be a member of the same unitary business 25        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 26        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the   HB1898- 84 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 2        required to apportion business income under different 3        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 4        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 5        extent that dividends were included in base income of 6        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 7        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 8        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 9        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 10        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 11        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 12        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 13        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 14        accrued, or incurred. 15            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 16                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 17            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 18            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 19            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 20            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 21            with respect to such interest; or22                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 23            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 24            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 25            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 26            following:  HB1898- 85 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 2                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 3                to a person that is not a related member, and4                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 5                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 6                person did not have as a principal purpose the 7                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 8                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 9                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 10                terms; or 11                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 12            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 13            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 14            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 15            and terms and the principal purpose for the 16            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 17            or 18                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 19            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 20            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 21            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 22            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 23            to the application or use of an alternative method 24            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 25                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 26            Director from making any other adjustment   HB1898- 86 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 2            for any tax year beginning after the effective 3            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 4            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 5            Department and such regulations provide methods 6            and standards by which the Department will utilize 7            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 8            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 9        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 10        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 11        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 12        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 13        foreign person who would be a member of the same 14        unitary business group but for the fact that the 15        foreign person's business activity outside the United 16        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 17        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 18        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 19        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 20        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 21        from being included in the unitary business group 22        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 23        business income under different subsections of Section 24        304. The addition modification required by this 25        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 26        dividends were included in base income of the unitary   HB1898- 87 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        group for the same taxable year and received by the 2        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 3        business group (including amounts included in gross 4        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 5        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 6        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 7        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 8        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 9        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 10        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 11        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 12        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 13        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 14        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 15        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 16        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 17        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 18        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 19        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 20        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 21        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 22        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 23        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 24        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 25        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 26        similar types of intangible assets;  HB1898- 88 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:2                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 3            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 4            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 5            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 6            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 7            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 8            with respect to such item; or9                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 10            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 11            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 12            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 13            following:14                    (a) the person during the same taxable 15                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 16                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 17                not a related member, and18                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 19                intangible expense or cost between the 20                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 21                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 22                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 23                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 24                or25                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB1898- 89 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 2            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 3            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 4            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 5            writing to the application or use of an 6            alternative method of apportionment under Section 7            304(f); 8                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 9            Director from making any other adjustment 10            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 11            for any tax year beginning after the effective 12            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 13            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 14            Department and such regulations provide methods 15            and standards by which the Department will utilize 16            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 17            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 18        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 19        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 20        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 21        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 22        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 23        business group but for the fact that the person is 24        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 25        included in the unitary business group because he or 26        she is ordinarily required to apportion business   HB1898- 90 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 2        addition modification required by this subparagraph 3        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 4        included in base income of the unitary group for the 5        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 6        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 7        (including amounts included in gross income under 8        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 9        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 10        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 11        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 12        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 13        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 14        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 15        the addition modification required under Section 16        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;17            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 18        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 19        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 20        Act;21            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 22        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 23        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 24        for the taxable year; 25            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal 26        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal   HB1898- 91 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 2        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 3        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 4        Tax Credit Act; 5    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 6    amounts:7            (E) The valuation limitation amount;8            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 9        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 10        and included in such total for the taxable year;11            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 12        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 13        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 14        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 15        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 16        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 17        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 18        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 19        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 20        net of bond premium amortization;21            (H) Any income of the partnership which 22        constitutes personal service income as defined in 23        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 24        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance 25        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered 26        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater;   HB1898- 92 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 2        Section 250;3            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 4        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 5        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 6        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 7        including amounts distributable to organizations 8        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 9        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 10        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;11            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 12        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 13        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 14        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 15        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 16        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 18        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 19        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 22        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 24        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 25        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 26        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section   HB1898- 93 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        250;2            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 3        such total which were paid by a corporation which 4        conducts business operations in a River Edge 5        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 6        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 7        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 8        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 9        the provisions of Section 250;10            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 11        job training project established pursuant to the Real 12        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;13            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total that were paid by a corporation that 15        conducts business operations in a federally designated 16        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 17        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 18        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 19        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 20        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 21        this subparagraph (M);22            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 23        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 24        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 25        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 26        the Internal Revenue Code;  HB1898- 94 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 2        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 3        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 4        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 5        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 6        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:7                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 8            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 9            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 10            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 11            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 12            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 13            including the bonus depreciation deduction;14                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 15            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 16            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 17            0.429); and18                (3) for taxable years ending after December 19            31, 2005:20                    (i) for property on which a bonus 21                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 22                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 23                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 24                by 0.429);25                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted   HB1898- 95 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 2                1.0;3                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 4                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 5                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 6                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 7                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 8                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 9                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 10                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 11                depreciation on that property; and12                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 13                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 14                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 15                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 16                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 17                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 18                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 19                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 20                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 21                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 22            The aggregate amount deducted under this 23        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 24        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 25        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 26        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection   HB1898- 96 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 2        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 5        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 6        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 7        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 8        equal to that addition modification.9            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 10        the last day of the last tax year for which a 11        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 12        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 13        required in any taxable year to make an addition 14        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 15        equal to that addition modification. 16            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 17        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 18        one piece of property.19            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 20        provisions of Section 250;21            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 22        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 23        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 24        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 25        modification with respect to such transaction under 26        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12),   HB1898- 97 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 2        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 3        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 4        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 5        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 6        that is required to make an addition modification with 7        respect to such transaction under Section 8        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 9        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 10        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 11        from Section 250; 12            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 13        into account for the taxable year (net of the 14        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 15        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 16        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 17        for the fact that the foreign person's business 18        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 19        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 20        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 21        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 22        business group but for the fact that the person is 23        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 24        included in the unitary business group because he or 25        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 26        income under different subsections of Section 304, but   HB1898- 98 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 2        made for the same taxable year under Section 3        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 4        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 5        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 6            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 7        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 8        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 9        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 10        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 11        for the fact that the foreign person's business 12        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 13        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 14        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 15        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 16        business group but for the fact that the person is 17        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 18        included in the unitary business group because he or 19        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 20        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 21        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 22        made for the same taxable year under Section 23        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 24        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 25        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 26        Section 250;   HB1898- 99 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 2        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 3        add back any insurance premiums under Section 4        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 5        that part of a reimbursement received from the 6        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 7        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 8        company) that would have been taken into account as a 9        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 10        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 11        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 12        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 13        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 14        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 15        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 16        Section 250; and 17            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 19        operating in this State and licensed under the 20        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 21        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 22        organization operating in this State and licensed 23        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 24        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 25        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 26        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be   HB1898- 100 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 2        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 3        of Section 250.  4    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.5        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 6    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 7    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 8    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 9    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 10    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 11    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 12    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 13    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 14    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 15    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 16    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 17    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 18    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 19    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 20    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 21    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 22    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 23    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 24    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 25    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition   HB1898- 101 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 2    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 3    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 4    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 5    addition modification must be made under those 6    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 7    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 8    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 9    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 10    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 11    Internal Revenue Code.12        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 13    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 14    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:15            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 16        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 17        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 18        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 19        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 20        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 21        Internal Revenue Code;22            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 23        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 24        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 25        insurance company taxable income;26            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of   HB1898- 102 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 2        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 3        investment company taxable income;4            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 5        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 6        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 7        real estate investment trust taxable income;8            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 9        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 10        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 11        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 12        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 13        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 14        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 15        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 16        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 17        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 18        determined as if the election provided by Section 19        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 20        effect for all such years;21            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 22        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 23        organization determined in accordance with the 24        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 25        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 26        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage   HB1898- 103 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        activities against income from nonpatronage 2        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 3        association may make an election to follow its federal 4        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 5        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 6        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 7        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 8        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 9        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 10        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 11        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 12        effective for all taxable years with original returns 13        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 14        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 15        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 16        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 17        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 18        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 19        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 20        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 21        requirements for documenting the elections and any 22        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 23        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 24        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 25        existing law; 26            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i)   HB1898- 104 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 2        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 3        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 4        of such corporation determined in accordance with 5        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 6        that taxable income shall take into account those 7        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 8        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 9        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 10        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 11        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 12        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 13        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 14        such corporation determined in accordance with the 15        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 16        1982; and17            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 18        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 19        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 20        income shall take into account those items which are 21        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 22        but which would be taken into account by an individual 23        in calculating his taxable income.24        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 25    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 26    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or   HB1898- 105 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1    business has been classified as business income and in a 2    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 3    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 4    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 5    related to that asset or business that generated the 6    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 7    business income in the year of the disposition of the 8    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 9    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 10    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 11    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 12    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 13    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 14    preceding taxable years.  15    (f) Valuation limitation amount.16        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 17    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 18    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:19            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 20        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 21        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 23        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 24        plus25            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1,   HB1898- 106 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 2        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 3        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 4        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 5        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 6        of such gain included in the amount determined under 7        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).8        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.9            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 10        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 11        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 12        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 13        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 14        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 15        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 16        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 17        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 18        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 19        such property.20            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 21        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 22        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 23        amount for such property is that amount which bears 24        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 25        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 26        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in   HB1898- 107 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 2        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 3        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 4        period for the property.5            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 6        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 7        purposes of this paragraph. 8    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 9otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 10to be deducted more than once. 11    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 12this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 13the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 14account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 15taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 16year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 17computation of base income and net income under this Act for 18such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 19August 1, 1969 or otherwise.20(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 21102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 2212-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 23Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 24Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647,   HB1898- 108 -LRB104 07487 HLH 17530 b1eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.